Washington statutes.
RCW 4.64.060

Execution docket—Index of record.

Every county clerk shall keep in the clerk's office a record, to be called the execution docket, which shall be a public record and open during the usual business hours to all persons desirous of inspecting it. The record must be indexed both directly and inversely, and include all judgments, abstracts, and transcripts of judgments in the clerk's office. The index must refer to each party against whom the judgment is rendered or whose property is affected by the judgment.

[ 1997 c 358 s 6; 1987 c 442 s 1105; 1967 ex.s. c 34 s 1; Code 1881 s 307; 1877 p 62 s 311; 1869 p 75 s 309; 1854 p 173 s 234; RRS s 444.]